apertium-olo.olo.lexc
LEXICON V_KÄVVÄ !!= * __@CODE@__ kävvä:käv
!%<act%>:%>y V-VV_02_FRONT_USUALLY-WEAK ;
%<act%>:%>y INDPRSSG1 ;
%<act%>:%>y INDPRSSG2 ;
%<act%>:%>y INDPRSPL1_FRONT ;
%<act%>:%>y INDPRSPL2_FRONT ;
%<act%>:%>y INDPRSCONNEG ;
%<act%>:%^V2U INDPRTPL3_dih     ;
%<act%>:%^V2U INDPRTCONNEGPL3_Dy        ;
%<act%>:%^V2U CONDPRSPL3_Däs ;

%<act%>: V-VV_02_FRONT_USUALLY-WEAK-VOWEL-LOSS ;     ! möin

!%<act%>:%>y V-VV_02_FRONT_USUALLY-STRONG ;
%<act%>:%>y INDPRSSG3_FRONT ;

%<act%>:%^V2U INDPRTCONNEG_nnyh         ;
%<act%>:%^V2U CONDPRS_S_FRONT ;
%<act%>:%^V2U CONDPRT_nnys ;
%<act%>:%^V2U CONDPRTPL3_Dänys ;
%<act%>:%^V2U POT_nnE_FRONT ;
%<act%>:%^V2U POTPL3_Däneh ;
%<act%>:%^V2U IMPRT_Gä ;
%<act%>:%^V2U IMPRTPL3_Dähes ;
:%^V2U ACT-PRSPRC_KERIÄJY ;
:%^V2U ACT-PRFPRC_nnyH ;
:%^V2U PSS-PRSPRC_Dävy ;
:%^V2U PSS-PRFPRC_DU ;
:%^V2U M-INF_FRONT          ;

%<act%>:  V-VV_02_FRONT_USUALLY-STRONG-VOWEL-LOSS ;  ! möi

!: INDPRSPL3_vväh ;
%<act%>%<pri%>%<pri%>%<p3%>%<pl%>:väh K	;
%<inf%>:%>vä K ;

!%<FIXME%>: V-VV_02_FRONT  ;
!%<act%>%<pri%>%<pri%>%<p1%>%<sg%>:yn K ;
!%<act%>%<pri%>%<pri%>%<p3%>%<sg%>:yy K ;


!! !Verbs of the Finnish type 3

LEXICON V_TULLA !!= * __@CODE@__ tulla:tul
:%{back%} V-VV_03_Harm-Neutr ;

LEXICON V_ULISTA !!= * __@CODE@__ ulista:ulis
:%{back%} V-VV_03_Harm-Neutr ;

LEXICON V_JUOSTA_BACK !!= * __@CODE@__ juosta:juoks
:%{back%} V_JUOSTA_01 ;
LEXICON V_JUOSTA_01 !!= * __@CODE@__ juosta:juoks
%<act%>:%>e INDPRSSG1 ;
%<act%>:%>e INDPRSSG2 ;
%<act%>:%>o INDPRSSG3_BACK ;
%<act%>:%>e INDPRSPL1 ;
%<act%>:%>e INDPRSPL2 ;
%<act%>: INDPRSPL3_dah ;
%<act%>:%>e INDPRSCONNEG_WEAK ;
! MORE WORK NEEDED 2015-11
%<act%>: INDPRTSG1     ;
%<act%>: INDPRTSG2     ;
%<act%>: INDPRTSG3     ;
%<act%>: INDPRTPL1     ;
%<act%>: INDPRTPL2     ;
%<act%>: INDPRTPL3_dih     ;
%<act%>: INDPRTCONNEG_nUh ;
%<act%>: INDPRTCONNEGPL3_DU ;

%<act%>:%^VOICE CONDPRS_IS_BACK ;
%<act%>: CONDPRSPL3_DAs ;
%<act%>: CONDPRT_nUs ;
%<act%>: CONDPRTPL3_DAnnUs ;
%<act%>: POT_N ;
%<act%>: POTPL3_DAnneh ;
%<act%>: IMPRT_GA ;
%<act%>: IMPRTPL3_DAhes ;

:%^VOICEi ACT-PRSPRC_OSTAI ;
: ACT-PRFPRC_nUH ;
: PSS-PRSPRC_DAvU ;
: PSS-PRFPRC_DU ;
:%^VOICEe M-INF ;
%<inf%>:%>d%{aä%}%^WGStem K ;
%<ger%>%<temp%>:%>de%^WGStems K ;

LEXICON V_PAISTA !!= * __@CODE@__ paista:pagis
:%{back%} V_PAISTA_01 ;
LEXICON V_PAISTA_01 !!= * __@CODE@__ paista:pagis

: V-VV_03_Harm-Neutr_VOWEL-STEM ;
: V-VV_03_Harm-Neutr_CONSONANT-STEM ;

%<act%>:%>e INDPRSSG1 ;
%<act%>:%>e INDPRSSG2 ;
%<act%>:%>o INDPRSSG3_BACK ;
%<act%>:%>e INDPRSPL1_BACK ;
%<act%>:%>e INDPRSPL2_BACK ;
%<act%>:%^Pen%^%^WGStem INDPRSPL3_tah ;
%<act%>:%>e INDPRSCONNEG_WEAK ;
! MORE WORK NEEDED 2015-11
%<act%>: INDPRTSG1     ;
%<act%>: INDPRTSG2     ;
%<act%>: INDPRTSG3     ;
%<act%>: INDPRTPL1_BACK     ;
%<act%>: INDPRTPL2_BACK     ;
%<act%>:%^Pen%^%^WGStem INDPRTPL3_tih     ;
%<act%>: INDPRTCONNEG_nuh ;
%<act%>:%^Pen%^%^WGStem INDPRTCONNEGPL3_tu ;

%<act%>:%^VOICE CONDPRS_IS_BACK ;
%<act%>:%^Pen%^%^WGStem CONDPRSPL3_tas ;
%<act%>: CONDPRT_nus ;
%<act%>:%^Pen%^%^WGStem CONDPRTPL3_tannus ;
%<act%>: POT_N_BACK ;
%<act%>:%^Pen%^%^WGStem POTPL3_tanneh ;
%<act%>: IMPRT_Ga ;
%<act%>:%^Pen%^%^WGStem IMPRTPL3_tahes ;

:%^VOICEi ACT-PRSPRC_OSTAI ;
: ACT-PRFPRC_nuH ;
:%^Pen%^%^WGStem PSS-PRSPRC_tavu ;
:%^Pen%^%^WGStem PSS-PRFPRC_tu ;
:%^VOICEe M-INF_BACK ;
%<inf%>:%>d%{aä%}%^WGStem K ;
%<ger%>%<temp%>:%^Pen%^%^WGStem%>te K ;



LEXICON V_PESTÄ !!= * __@CODE@__ pestä:pes
:%{front%} V-VV_03_Harm-Neutr ;
!: V-VV_03_FRONT ;

LEXICON V_NOSTA !!= * __@CODE@__ nosta:no
:%{back%} V_NOSTA/XX_01 ;
LEXICON V_NOSTA/XX_01 !!= * __@CODE@__ nosta:no
! no/sta, -uzen, -uzou, -stah
:us V-VV_03_Harm-Neutr_VOWEL-STEM ;
:s V-VV_03_Harm-Neutr_CONSONANT-STEM ;
!%<act%>%<pri%>%<pri%>%<p1%>%<sg%>:uzen K ;
!%<act%>%<pri%>%<pri%>%<p3%>%<sg%>:uzou K ;
!%<act%>%<pri%>%<pri%>%<p3%>%<pl%>:stah K  ;

!! Verbs of the Finnish type 3 but not identical

LEXICON V_KUULTA !!= * __@CODE@__ kuulta:kuul
: V-VV_KUULLA ;

LEXICON V_KUULTA-SG3 !!= * __@CODE@__ kuulta:kuul
: V-VV_KUULLA ;


LEXICON V_VIERTÄ !!= * __@CODE@__ viertä:vier
: V-VV_VIERRÄ ;

LEXICON V_VIERTÄ-SG3 !!= * __@CODE@__ viertä:vier
: V-VV_VIERRÄ ;

!! Verbs of the Finnish type 3 but not identical
!! gradation: yes

LEXICON V_KUVITELLA !!= * __@CODE@__ kuvitella:kuvittel
: V-VV_KUVITELLA ;


LEXICON V_TYPÄTÄ !!= * __@CODE@__ typätä:typpä
: #;

LEXICON V_KÄITÄ !!= * __@CODE@__ käitä:käge
: V-VV_04_FRONT ;

LEXICON V_SUVATA !!= * __@CODE@__ suvata:suva
: V-VV_04_BACK ;


!! !Verbs of the Finnish type 4

LEXICON V_AVATA !!= * __@CODE@__ avata:ava
! gradation: no
:%^A2U%>a V-VV_04_BACK-WITH-LENGTHENED-VOWEL-STRONG-GRADE ;
: V-VV_04_BACK-WITHOUT-LENGTHENED-VOWEL-STRONG-GRADE ;
: V-VV_04_BACK-WITHOUT-LENGTHENED-VOWEL-WEAK-GRADE ;

LEXICON V_AVATA-SG3 !!= * __@CODE@__ avata:ava
! gradation: no
:%^A2U%>a V-VV_04_BACK-WITH-LENGTHENED-VOWEL-STRONG-GRADE ;
: V-VV_04_BACK-WITHOUT-LENGTHENED-VOWEL-STRONG-GRADE ;
: V-VV_04_BACK-WITHOUT-LENGTHENED-VOWEL-WEAK-GRADE ;

LEXICON V_ARVOTA !!= * __@CODE@__ arvota:arvo
! gradation: no
:o V-VV_04_BACK-WITH-LENGTHENED-VOWEL-STRONG-GRADE ;
: V-VV_04_BACK-WITHOUT-LENGTHENED-VOWEL-STRONG-GRADE ;
: V-VV_04_BACK-WITHOUT-LENGTHENED-VOWEL-WEAK-GRADE ;

LEXICON V_ARVOTA-SG3 !!= * __@CODE@__ arvota:arvo
! gradation: no
:o V-VV_04_BACK-WITH-LENGTHENED-VOWEL-STRONG-GRADE ;
: V-VV_04_BACK-WITHOUT-LENGTHENED-VOWEL-STRONG-GRADE ;
: V-VV_04_BACK-WITHOUT-LENGTHENED-VOWEL-WEAK-GRADE ;

LEXICON V_KABLITA !!= * __@CODE@__ kablita:kabli
! gradation: no
:e V-VV_04_BACK-WITH-LENGTHENED-VOWEL-STRONG-GRADE ;
: V-VV_04_BACK-WITHOUT-LENGTHENED-VOWEL-STRONG-GRADE ;
: V-VV_04_BACK-WITHOUT-LENGTHENED-VOWEL-WEAK-GRADE ;

LEXICON V_KABLITA-SG3 !!= * __@CODE@__ kablita:kabli
! gradation: no
:e V-VV_04_BACK-WITH-LENGTHENED-VOWEL-STRONG-GRADE ;
: V-VV_04_BACK-WITHOUT-LENGTHENED-VOWEL-STRONG-GRADE ;
: V-VV_04_BACK-WITHOUT-LENGTHENED-VOWEL-WEAK-GRADE ;

LEXICON V_BAUHUTA !!= * __@CODE@__ bauhuta:bauhu
! gradation: no
:u V-VV_04_BACK-WITH-LENGTHENED-VOWEL-STRONG-GRADE ;
: V-VV_04_BACK-WITHOUT-LENGTHENED-VOWEL-STRONG-GRADE ;
: V-VV_04_BACK-WITHOUT-LENGTHENED-VOWEL-WEAK-GRADE ;

LEXICON V_BAUHUTA-SG3 !!= * __@CODE@__ bauhuta:bauhu
! gradation: no
:u V-VV_04_BACK-WITH-LENGTHENED-VOWEL-STRONG-GRADE ;
: V-VV_04_BACK-WITHOUT-LENGTHENED-VOWEL-STRONG-GRADE ;
: V-VV_04_BACK-WITHOUT-LENGTHENED-VOWEL-WEAK-GRADE ;

LEXICON V_LANGETA !!= * __@CODE@__ langeta:lange
! gradation: no
:e V-VV_04_BACK-WITH-LENGTHENED-VOWEL-STRONG-GRADE ;
: V-VV_04_BACK-WITHOUT-LENGTHENED-VOWEL-STRONG-GRADE ;
: V-VV_04_BACK-WITHOUT-LENGTHENED-VOWEL-WEAK-GRADE ;

LEXICON V_LANGETA-SG3 !!= * __@CODE@__ langeta:lange
! gradation: no
:e V-VV_04_BACK-WITH-LENGTHENED-VOWEL-STRONG-GRADE ;
: V-VV_04_BACK-WITHOUT-LENGTHENED-VOWEL-STRONG-GRADE ;
: V-VV_04_BACK-WITHOUT-LENGTHENED-VOWEL-WEAK-GRADE ;

LEXICON V_ALLATA !!= * __@CODE@__ allata:alga
! gradation: yes
:%^A2U%>a V-VV_04_BACK-WITH-LENGTHENED-VOWEL-STRONG-GRADE ;
: V-VV_04_BACK-WITHOUT-LENGTHENED-VOWEL-STRONG-GRADE ;
:%^WGStem V-VV_04_BACK-WITHOUT-LENGTHENED-VOWEL-WEAK-GRADE ;

LEXICON V_ALLATA-SG3 !!= * __@CODE@__ allata:alga
! gradation: yes
:%^A2U%>a V-VV_04_BACK-WITH-LENGTHENED-VOWEL-STRONG-GRADE ;
: V-VV_04_BACK-WITHOUT-LENGTHENED-VOWEL-STRONG-GRADE ;
:%^WGStem V-VV_04_BACK-WITHOUT-LENGTHENED-VOWEL-WEAK-GRADE ;

LEXICON V_KIKOTA !!= * __@CODE@__ kikota:kikko
! gradation: yes
:%>o V-VV_04_BACK-WITH-LENGTHENED-VOWEL-STRONG-GRADE ;
: V-VV_04_BACK-WITHOUT-LENGTHENED-VOWEL-STRONG-GRADE ;
:%^WGStem V-VV_04_BACK-WITHOUT-LENGTHENED-VOWEL-WEAK-GRADE ;

LEXICON V_KIKOTA-SG3 !!= * __@CODE@__ kikota:kikko
! gradation: yes
:%>o V-VV_04_BACK-WITH-LENGTHENED-VOWEL-STRONG-GRADE ;
: V-VV_04_BACK-WITHOUT-LENGTHENED-VOWEL-STRONG-GRADE ;
:%^WGStem V-VV_04_BACK-WITHOUT-LENGTHENED-VOWEL-WEAK-GRADE ;

LEXICON V_RUVETA !!= * __@CODE@__ ruveta:rube
! gradation: yes
:%>e V-VV_04_BACK-WITH-LENGTHENED-VOWEL-STRONG-GRADE ;
: V-VV_04_BACK-WITHOUT-LENGTHENED-VOWEL-STRONG-GRADE ;
:%^WGStem V-VV_04_BACK-WITHOUT-LENGTHENED-VOWEL-WEAK-GRADE ;

LEXICON verbs
eroitella%<vblex%>:eroittel V_KUVITELLA  "erotella" ;
halleta%<vblex%>:halleta V_TYPÄTÄ  "haleta" ;
hannata%<vblex%>:hanna V_AVATA  "telmiä" ;
hirnuta%<vblex%>:hirnu V_BAUHUTA  "aivastaa" ;
hoksailla%<vblex%>:hoksail V_TULLA  "hoksailla" ;
huarota%<vblex%>:huaro V_ARVOTA  "mennä haralleen" ;
huikata%<vblex%>:huikka V_ALLATA  "huikata" ;
huškutella%<vblex%>:huškuttel V_KUVITELLA  "huiskutella" ;
hyvitellä%<vblex%>:hyvittel V_VIERTÄ  "tehdä jtk jnk hyväksi" ;
hädäillä%<vblex%>:hädäil V_PESTÄ  "hätäillä" ;
juosta%<vblex%>:juoks V_JUOSTA_BACK  "juosta" ;
jurišta%<vblex%>:juriš V_ULISTA  "jyristä" ;
kablita%<vblex%>:kabli V_KABLITA  "kaapia" ;
kabuta%<vblex%>:kabu V_BAUHUTA  "kavuta" ;
kartata%<vblex%>:karta V_AVATA  "karstata" ;
kartita%<vblex%>:karti V_KABLITA  "karstata" ;
kastella%<vblex%>:kastel V_TULLA  "kostutella" ;
kerrata%<vblex%>:kerda V_ALLATA  "kerrata (lankaa)" ;
kidžistä%<vblex%>:kidžis V_PESTÄ  "kitistä" ;
kikota%<vblex%>:kikko V_KIKOTA  "keikkua" ;
kohišta%<vblex%>:kohiš V_ULISTA  "kohista" ;
kudžišta%<vblex%>:kudžiš V_ULISTA  "vikistä" ;
kuolla%<vblex%>:kuol V_KUULTA  "kuolla" ;
kuulla%<vblex%>:kuul V_KUULTA  "kuulla" ;
kuvitella%<vblex%>:kuvittel V_KUVITELLA  "kuvitella" ;
kyzellä%<vblex%>:kyzel V_VIERTÄ  "kysellä" ;
käitä%<vblex%>:käge V_KÄITÄ  "aikoa" ;
kävellä%<vblex%>:kävel V_VIERTÄ  "kävellä" ;
kävvä%<vblex%>:käv V_KÄVVÄ  "käydä" ;
lahota%<vblex%>:laho V_ARVOTA  "lahota" ;
lainoilla%<vblex%>:lainoil V_TULLA  "nieleskellä" ;
langeta%<vblex%>:lange V_LANGETA  "langeta" ;
liijellä%<vblex%>:liidel V_PESTÄ  "liidellä" ;
livota%<vblex%>:ligo V_KIKOTA  "liota" ;
lovata%<vblex%>:loda V_ALLATA  "kolista" ;
lumota%<vblex%>:lumo V_ARVOTA  "lumota" ;
manata%<vblex%>:mana V_AVATA  "manata" ;
meruta%<vblex%>:meru V_BAUHUTA  "sulattaa voita t. rasvaa (vars.karjala)" ;
muanitella%<vblex%>:muanittel V_KUVITELLA  "houkutella" ;
muhišta%<vblex%>:muhiš V_ULISTA  "hymyillä" ;
mustella%<vblex%>:mustel V_KUULTA  "muistella" ;
nosta%<vblex%>:no V_NOSTA  "nousta (no/sta, -uzen, -uzou, -stah)" ;
nʼelʼlʼuta%<vblex%>:nʼelʼlʼu V_BAUHUTA  "juosta kevyesti" ;
nʼokata%<vblex%>:nʼokka V_TYPÄTÄ  "pistää (hyttynen, käärme)" ;
nʼopata%<vblex%>:nʼoppa V_TYPÄTÄ  "napata" ;
nʼuokata%<vblex%>:nʼuokka V_TYPÄTÄ  "nokkaista" ;
ommella%<vblex%>:ommel V_KUULTA  "ommella" ;
paista%<vblex%>:pagis V_PAISTA  "puhua" ;
pavvahtella%<vblex%>:pavvahtel V_TULLA  "paukahdella" ;
pellätellä%<vblex%>:pellättel V_PESTÄ  "pelotellä" ;
plikata%<vblex%>:plikka V_ALLATA  "napauttaa" ;
pločkutella%<vblex%>:pločkuttel V_KUVITELLA  "lätsytellä" ;
porota%<vblex%>:poro V_ARVOTA  "irrota" ;
pračkata%<vblex%>:pračka V_AVATA  "paukauttaa" ;
puhketa%<vblex%>:puhke V_LANGETA  "puhjeta" ;
rohista%<vblex%>:rohis V_ULISTA  "rohista" ;
roita%<vblex%>:rodi V_KABLITA  "tapahtua" ;
ruveta%<vblex%>:rube V_RUVETA  "ruveta" ;
rämištä%<vblex%>:rämiš V_PESTÄ  "rämistä" ;
sanella%<vblex%>:sanel V_KUULTA  "sanella" ;
savvuta%<vblex%>:savvu V_BAUHUTA  "savuta" ;
sevota%<vblex%>:sego V_KIKOTA  "seota" ;
suvata%<vblex%>:suva V_SUVATA  "pitää" ;
tuhota%<vblex%>:tuho V_ARVOTA  "tuiskuttaa" ;
tuhuta%<vblex%>:tuhu V_BAUHUTA-SG3  "pyryttää" ;
turvata%<vblex%>:turva V_AVATA  "turvata" ;
tuulta%<vblex%>:tuul V_KUULTA-SG3  "tuulla" ;
typätä%<vblex%>:typpä V_TYPÄTÄ  "tilkitä" ;
uijella%<vblex%>:uidel V_KUULTA  "uiskennella" ;
ummata%<vblex%>:umba V_ALLATA  "sulkea" ;
upota%<vblex%>:uppo V_KIKOTA  "hukkua" ;
urostella%<vblex%>:urostel V_TULLA  "rauhoitella" ;
uskoitella%<vblex%>:uskoittel V_KUVITELLA  "uskotella" ;
vainuta%<vblex%>:vainu V_BAUHUTA  "vainuta" ;
vajota%<vblex%>:vajo V_ARVOTA  "vajota" ;
valota%<vblex%>:valgo V_KIKOTA  "valjeta" ;
viertä%<vblex%>:vier V_VIERTÄ  "" ;
viiltä%<vblex%>:viil V_VIERTÄ  "leikata kangasta tai nahkaa ommeltavaksi" ;
virrota%<vblex%>:virgo V_KIKOTA  "virota" ;
vitkitellä%<vblex%>:vitkittel V_PESTÄ  "viivytellä" ;
vodžista%<vblex%>:vodžis V_ULISTA  "natista" ;
čuhkata%<vblex%>:čuhka V_AVATA  "tuhauttaa" ;
šuorita%<vblex%>:šuori V_KABLITA  "valmistautua" ;
LEXICON V_NEWWORDS
mukeldella:mukeldel V_TULLA "" ;
